Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-771
Nebraska community college degrees;
how treated.

For
purposes of financial aid relating to postsecondary education and admission
to postsecondary educational institutions, a student shall be deemed a high
school graduate if he or she has obtained an associate of arts degree or an
associate of science degree from a community college in Nebraska.

Laws 2009, LB102, § 1.